Tennessee, session 114, HB0482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-201(d)(1), is amended by
inserting the language "prostate cancer, breast cancer, pancreatic cancer" immediately after
"testicular cancer,".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-201(d)(2)(A), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(iii) Any firefighter desiring to utilize the presumption established in this
subsection (d) for prostate cancer, breast cancer, or pancreatic cancer, must obtain a
physical medical examination after July 1, 2025, and the examination must include a
cancer screening that fails to reveal any evidence of prostate cancer, breast cancer, or
pancreatic cancer.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0482
002072
- 1 -